Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1405
Employees; eligible for other state or political subdivision employment.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, employees of the training center other than the director shall be eligible to be employed by any other state agency or department or by any political subdivision of the state.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 5, p. 2927.